Utah statutes.
38-1-28.   Notice of release of lien and substitution of alternate security.
(1)  The owner of any interest in real property that is subject to a
mechanics' lien recorded under this chapter, or any original contractor or
subcontractor affected by the lien, who disputes the correctness or validity
of the lien may record a notice of release of lien and substitution of
alternate security:
(a)  that meets the requirements of Subsection (2);
(b)  in the office of the county recorder where the lien was recorded; and
(c)  at any time before the expiration of 90 days after the day on which the
person filing a notice of release of lien and substitution of alternate
security is served with a summons and lien foreclosure complaint.
(2)  A notice of release of lien and substitution of alternate security
recorded under Subsection (1) shall:
(a)  meet the requirements for the recording of documents in Title 57, Chapter
3, Recording of Documents;
(b)  reference the lien sought to be released, including an entry number, book
number, and page number; and
(c)  have as an attachment a surety bond or evidence of a cash deposit that:
(i) (A)  if a surety bond, is executed by a surety company that is treasury
listed, A-rated by AM Best Company, and authorized to issue surety bonds in
this state; or
(B)  if evidence of a cash deposit, meets the requirements established by rule
by the Department of Commerce in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act;
(ii)  is in an amount equal to:
(A)  150% of the amount claimed by the lien claimant on a notice of lien or
determined under Subsection (7), if the lien claim is for $25,000 or more;
(B)  175% of the amount claimed by the lien claimant on a notice of lien or
determined under Subsection (7), if the lien claim is for at least $15,000 but
less than $25,000; or
(C)  200% of the amount claimed by the lien claimant on a notice of lien or
determined under Subsection (7), if the lien claim is for less than $15,000;
(iii)  is made payable to the lien claimant;
(iv)  is conditioned for the payment of:
(A)  the judgment that would have been rendered, or has been rendered against
the property in the action to enforce the lien; and
(B)  any costs and attorneys' fees awarded by the court; and
(v)  has as principal:
(A)  the owner of the interest in the real property; or
(B)  the original contractor or subcontractor affected by the lien.
(3) (a)  Upon the recording of the notice of release of lien and substitution
of alternate security under Subsection (1), the real property described in the
notice shall be released from the mechanics' lien to which the notice applies.
(b)  A recorded notice of release of lien and substitution of alternate
security is effective as to any amendment to the lien being released if the
bond amount remains enough to satisfy the requirements of Subsection
(2)(c)(ii).
(4) (a)  Upon the recording of a notice of release of lien and substitution of
alternate security under Subsection (1), the person recording the notice shall
serve a copy of the notice, together with any attachments, within 30 days upon
the lien claimant.
(b)  If a suit is pending to foreclose the lien at the time the notice is
served upon the lien claimant under Subsection (4)(a), the lien claimant
shall, within 90 days from the receipt of the notice, institute proceedings to
add the alternate security as a party to the lien foreclosure suit.
(5)  The alternate security attached to a notice of release of lien shall be
discharged and released upon:
(a)  the failure of the lien claimant to commence a suit against the alternate
security within the same time as an action to enforce the lien under Section
38-1-11;
(b)  the failure of the lien claimant to institute proceedings to add the
alternate security as a party to a lien foreclosure suit within the time
required by Subsection (4)(b);
(c)  the dismissal with prejudice of the lien foreclosure suit or suit against
the alternate security as to the lien claimant; or
(d)  the entry of judgment against the lien claimant in:
(i)  a lien foreclosure suit; or
(ii)  suit against the alternate security.
(6)  If a copy of the notice of release of lien and substitution of alternate
security is not served upon the lien claimant as provided in Subsection
(4)(a), the lien claimant shall have six months after the discovery of the
notice to commence an action against the alternate security, except that no
action may be commenced against the alternate security after two years from
the date the notice was recorded.
(7) (a)  The owner of any interest in real property that is subject to a
mechanics' lien recorded under this chapter or an original contractor or
subcontractor affected by a mechanics' lien recorded under this chapter who
disputes the amount claimed in a notice of lien may petition the district
court in the county in which the notice of lien is recorded for a summary
determination of the correct amount of a lien claim for the sole purpose of
providing alternate security.
(b)  A petition under this Subsection (7) shall:
(i)  state with specificity the factual and legal bases for disputing the
amount of the lien claim; and
(ii)  be supported by a sworn affidavit and any other evidence supporting the
petition.
(c)  A petitioner under Subsection (7)(a) shall, under Utah Rules of Civil
Procedure, Rule 4, serve on the lien claimant:
(i)  a copy of the petition; and
(ii)  a notice of hearing if a hearing is scheduled.
(d)  If a court finds a petition under Subsection (7)(a) insufficient, the
court may dismiss the petition without a hearing.
(e)  If a court finds a petition under Subsection (7)(a) sufficient, the court
shall schedule a hearing within 10 days to determine the correct amount of the
lien claim for the sole purpose of providing alternate security.
(f)  A lien claimant may:
(i)  attend a hearing held under this Subsection (7); and
(ii)  contest the petition.
(g)  A determination under this section is limited to a determination of the
amount of the lien claim for the sole purpose of providing alternate security
and does not conclusively establish:
(i)  the amount to which the lien claimant is entitled;
(ii)  the validity of the lien claim; or
(iii)  any person's right to any other legal remedy.
(h)  If a court, in a proceeding under this Subsection (7), determines that
the amount claimed in a notice of claim is excessive, the court shall set the
amount of the lien claim for the sole purpose of providing alternate security.
(i)  In an order under Subsection (7)(h), the court shall include a legal
description of the property.
(j)  A petitioner under this Subsection (7) may record a certified copy of any
order issued under this Subsection (7) in the county in which the lien is
recorded.
(k)  Attorneys' fees may not be awarded for a proceeding under this Subsection
(7), but shall be considered in any award of attorneys' fees under any other
provision of this chapter.
